California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
(3) For a supplemental expert witness who will express an opinion on a subject to be covered by another expert witness designated by an adverse party that was not among the subjects covered by an expert witness initially disclosed by the
party offering the supplemental expert witness, no more than 20 days after the initial expert witness disclosure date.

(e) The court may modify the disclosure requirements of subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, for expert witnesses presented solely for purposes of impeachment or rebuttal. In modifying the disclosure requirements, the court shall adopt disclosure requirements that expedite the court’s consideration of the issues presented and shall ensure that expert testimony presented solely for purposes of impeachment or rebuttal is strictly limited to the scope of the testimony that it intends to impeach or rebut.

(f) (1) A party whose expert witness has made a disclosure pursuant to this section shall promptly supplement or correct the expert witness’s disclosure in either of the following instances:

(A) In a timely manner if the party learns that in some material respect the disclosure is incomplete or incorrect, if the additional or corrective information has not otherwise been made known to the other parties during the disclosure or discovery process.

(B) As ordered by the court.

(2) A party’s duty to supplement or correct its expert witness’s disclosure includes the information included in the report and the information given during the expert witness’s deposition. Unless otherwise stipulated by the parties or ordered by the court, any supplementation or correction shall occur at least 14 days before trial of the applicable phase of the comprehensive adjudication.

(3) The court may authorize a supplemental deposition of an expert witness based on a supplemental disclosure made pursuant to this
subdivision. The court shall appropriately condition the authorization of a supplemental deposition of an expert witness to ensure the expeditious completion of the applicable phase of the comprehensive adjudication. The court may require the party whose expert makes the supplemental disclosure to pay some or all of the costs associated with the supplemental deposition.

(g) To the greatest extent possible, the parties shall serve expert witness disclosures electronically through an electronic service system, an electronic document repository, email, or another method of electronic transmission. If it is not possible for the party to serve his or her expert witness disclosures electronically, he or she shall serve the expert witness disclosures in an electronic format saved on a portable storage media device such as a compact disc or flash drive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Written Testimony [844. - 844.]

844.

(a) A court may require the parties in a comprehensive adjudication to submit written testimony of relevant witnesses in the forms of affidavits or declarations under penalty of perjury in lieu of presenting live testimony. The required written testimony may include, but is not limited to, expert witness opinions and testimony that authenticates documentary evidence. The court may order that the written testimony constitutes the entirety of the witness’s direct
testimony, require the written testimony to include any exhibits offered in support of the written testimony, and, in the case of written testimony of an expert witness, require a statement of the witness’s qualifications.

(b) If the court requires the submission of written testimony pursuant to subdivision (a), a complete copy of the direct testimony shall be served at least 21 days before trial. A complete copy of any rebuttal testimony shall be served no later than the first day of trial.

(c) If the contents of the written testimony would have been admissible if the witness testified orally, the written testimony shall be received by the court as a documentary exhibit if the witness whose written testimony is being offered is made available for cross-examination by all parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Special Master [845. - 846.]

845.

(a) The court may appoint one or more special masters whose duties may include the following:

(1) Investigating technical and legal issues, as directed by the court. The special master shall compile a report of findings in accordance with Section 846.

(2) Conducting joint factfinding with the parties, their designees, or both.

(3) Investigating the need for, and developing a proposal for, a preliminary injunction pursuant to Article 13 (commencing with Section 847).

(4) Performing other tasks the court may deem appropriate.

(b) The court shall fix the special master’s compensation on the basis and terms stated in the appointing order, and the court may set a new basis and new terms after giving the parties notice and an opportunity to be heard. The court shall allocate payment of the special master’s compensation among the parties in an amount and a manner that the court deems equitable. The court may waive a party’s obligations to pay the special master’s compensation upon a showing of good cause.

(c) The court may request the State Water Resources Control Board or the department to recommend candidates for appointment as a special master or to review the qualifications of candidates.

(d) (1) In any adjudication in a basin in which one or more groundwater sustainability agencies have adopted a groundwater sustainability plan that has been approved by the Department
 of Water Resources, the court shall request that the groundwater sustainability agency provide a technical report, if the agency is able to do so at a reasonable effort and expense. The report shall, at a minimum, quantify and describe the groundwater use of parties that have not otherwise appeared before the court. The groundwater sustainability agency may include in the report, but is not limited to, parties excused or treated separately pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 833, parties for which the court lacks jurisdiction, and parties that have been, or it is anticipated may be, found in default by the court. The groundwater sustainability agency may provide the report at its own election, and may include areas outside of its jurisdictional boundary if another groundwater sustainability agency in the basin is unable or unwilling to provide a report.

(2) A groundwater sustainability agency that provides a report pursuant to paragraph (1)
 shall not be entitled to a fee for its services, but shall be paid or reimbursed the total expense incurred by the agency, including salaries, wages, traveling expenses, and all costs of whatsoever character are properly chargeable to providing the report. The court shall apportion the total expenses reimbursable to the groundwater sustainability agency for providing the report among the parties in an amount, and in a manner, that the court deems equitable.

(3) During the pendency of the report provided pursuant to paragraph (1), upon a noticed motion by a groundwater sustainability agency, and following a hearing by the court after at least 10 days’ notice to the parties, the court may order such interim or partial payments of the expense to be made by the parties.

(4) A report provided by a groundwater sustainability agency pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be prima facie evidence
 of the physical facts found in the report, but the court shall hear evidence that may be offered by any party to rebut the report or the prima facie evidence.

(e) This section does not limit the authority of the court to make a reference pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 2000) of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Water Code.

(f) This section does not limit the authority to appoint a watermaster pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4050) of Part 4 of Division 2 of the Water Code or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 643, Sec. 4.   (AB 1466)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

846.

(a) The special master shall make a draft report available to the parties and provide at least 60 days for the parties to submit written objections to the draft report.

(b) An objection to the draft report shall identify the specific grounds and evidence on which the objection is based.

(c) The special master may notice and hold
hearings, as he or she deems appropriate, to gather information or address issues raised in the objections to the draft report.

(d) The special master shall consider the objections to the draft report and develop a final report that shall be filed with the court, together with supporting evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Preliminary Injunction [847. - 847.]

847.

(a) Upon a showing that the basin is in a condition of long-term overdraft, the court may, upon notice and hearing, issue a preliminary injunction.

(b) Bulletins and other reports of the department, and a report of a special master indicating that a condition of long-term overdraft exists in the basin, shall be admissible as evidence of a condition of long-term overdraft. This subdivision does not
limit the admissibility of other relevant evidence.

(c) The preliminary injunction may include any of the following terms:

(1) A moratorium on new or increased appropriations of water.

(2) A limitation on, or reduction in, the diversion or extraction of water.

(3) An allocation among the parties establishing amounts of extraction allowed during the pendency of the comprehensive adjudication.

(4) Procedures for voluntary transfers.

(d) The court shall issue a preliminary injunction upon determining all of the following:

(1) The basin is in a condition of
long-term overdraft.

(2) The basin has been designated as a probationary basin or the planning deadlines in subdivision (a) of Section 10720.7 of the Water Code are not being complied with.

(3) There is no interim plan in effect under Section 10735.8 of the Water Code.

(e) The court may provide a schedule for further reductions in extractions over a period of years if it finds that doing so appears reasonably necessary to achieve groundwater sustainability within the timelines provided in subdivision (b) of Section 10727.2 of the Water Code.

(f) The terms of a preliminary injunction shall not determine the rights in a final judgment of the comprehensive adjudication.

(g) A bond or
undertaking shall not be required for the issuance of a preliminary injunction pursuant to this section.

(h) The court may appoint a watermaster to oversee enforcement of the preliminary injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Stay [848. - 848.]

848.

(a) Upon the court’s own motion or the motion of any party to a comprehensive adjudication, a court may stay a comprehensive adjudication for a period of up to one year, subject to renewal in the court’s discretion upon a showing of good cause, in order to facilitate any of the following:

(1) Adoption of a groundwater sustainability plan that provides for a physical solution or otherwise addresses
issues in the comprehensive adjudication.

(2) The development of technical studies that may be useful to the parties in the comprehensive adjudication.

(3) Voluntary mediation or participation in a settlement conference on all, or a portion of, the subject matters or legal questions identified in the comprehensive adjudication.

(4) Compromise and settlement of the comprehensive adjudication or issues in the comprehensive adjudication.

(b) Before renewing a stay granted pursuant to subdivision (a), the parties shall report on the progress being made on the issues that were identified as the reasons for the stay.

(c) A stay pursuant to this section shall not stay, or otherwise delay, the
parties’ obligations to provide initial disclosures pursuant to Section 842 unless the court determines the initial disclosures will not benefit resolution of the comprehensive adjudication.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. Physical Solution [849. - 849.]

849.

(a) The court shall have the authority and the duty to impose a physical solution on the parties in a comprehensive adjudication where necessary and consistent with Article 2 of Section X of the California Constitution.

(b) Before adopting a physical solution, the court shall consider any existing groundwater sustainability plan or program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 1390)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. Judgment [850. - 850.]

850.

(a) The court may enter a judgment in a comprehensive adjudication if the court finds that the judgment meets all of the following criteria:

(1) It is consistent with Section 2 of Article X of the California Constitution.

(2) It is consistent with the water right priorities of all nonstipulating parties and any persons who have claims that are exempted pursuant to Section 833 in the basin.

(3) It treats all objecting parties and any persons who have claims that are exempted pursuant to Section 833 equitably as compared to the stipulating parties.

(4) It considers the water use of and accessibility of water for small farmers and disadvantaged communities. This consideration shall be consistent with the conditions identified in this subdivision.

(b) The court may enter judgment in an adjudication action for a basin required to have a groundwater sustainability plan under the
 Sustainable Groundwater Management Act (Part 2.74 (commencing with Section 10720) of Division 6 of the Water Code), if in addition to the criteria enumerated in subdivision (a), the court also finds that the judgment will not substantially impair the ability of a groundwater sustainability agency, the State Water Resources Control Board, or the department to comply with the Sustainable Groundwater Management Act and to achieve sustainable groundwater management.

(c) (1) In order to assist the court in making the findings required by this section, the court may refer the matter to the State Water Resources Control Board for investigation and report pursuant to Section 2001 of the Water Code. A party may request that the court refer
 the matter to the State Water Resources Control Board pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) Notwithstanding any inconsistencies with Article 2 (commencing with Section 2010) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Water Code, for a reference undertaken by the State Water Resources Control Board under paragraph (1), the State Water Resources Control Board and Department of Water Resources shall jointly investigate and submit the report under paragraph (1).

(d) If a party or group of parties submits a proposed stipulated judgment that is supported by more than 50 percent of all parties who are groundwater extractors in the basin or use the basin for groundwater storage and is supported by groundwater extractors responsible for
 at least 75 percent of the groundwater extracted in the basin during the five calendar years before the filing of the complaint, the court may adopt the proposed stipulated judgment, as applied to the stipulating parties, if the proposed stipulated judgment meets the criteria described in subdivision (a). A party objecting to a proposed stipulated judgment shall demonstrate, by a preponderance of evidence, that the proposed stipulated judgment does not satisfy one or more criteria described in subdivision (a) or that it substantially violates the water rights of the objecting party. If the objecting party is unable to make this showing, the court may impose the proposed stipulated judgment on the objecting party. An objecting party may be subject to a preliminary injunction issued pursuant to Section 847 while their objections are being resolved.

(e) For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

(1) “Disadvantaged communities” means communities identified by the California Environmental Protection Agency as disadvantaged communities pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) “Small farmers” means farmers with between ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) in gross farm sales, as referenced in the Department of Food and Agriculture’s California Underserved and Small Producers Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 665, Sec. 3.   (AB 779)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. Judgment Binding on Successors [851. - 851.]

851.

The judgment in a comprehensive adjudication conducted pursuant to this chapter shall be binding on the parties to the comprehensive adjudication and all their successors in interest, including, but not limited to, heirs, executors, administrators, assigns, lessees, licensees, the agents and employees of the parties to the comprehensive adjudication and all their successors in interest, and all landowners or other persons
claiming rights to extract groundwater from the basin whose claims have not been exempted and are covered by the notice provided in the comprehensive adjudication.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 31.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 18. Continuing Jurisdiction [852. - 852.]

852.

The court shall have continuing jurisdiction to modify or amend a final judgment in a comprehensive adjudication in response to new information, changed circumstances, the interests of justice, or to ensure that the criteria of subdivision (a) of Section 850 are met. If feasible, the judge who heard the original comprehensive adjudication shall preside over actions or motions to modify or amend the final
judgment.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 672, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 33.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Actions Against Coowners of Mines [853. - 859.]

853.

Upon the failure of a coowner of a mine or mining claim to contribute his proportionate share of the taxes that have been levied and assessed upon the mine or mining claim for the period of five years, a coowner who has paid that share may, at the expiration of the five years, serve upon the delinquent coowner notice thereof.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 850 (as added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 29.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

854.

The notice shall be served in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action, but where service is by publication, the publication shall be in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the mine or mining claim is situated or if there is no such newspaper, in such a newspaper in an adjoining county, and the publication shall be at least once a week for 90
 days.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 851 (as amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 32.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

855.

If before the expiration of 90 days from the service the delinquent fails or refuses to contribute his proportionate share of the taxes, the coowner contributing such share may file in the superior court of the county in which the mine or mining claim is situated a verified petition setting forth the facts and particularly describing the mine or mining claim.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 852 (as added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 52) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 34.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

856.

If the mine or mining claim is situated in more than one county, the petition may be filed in the superior court of either county.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 853 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 35.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

857.

The clerk shall set the petition for hearing by the court and give notice of the hearing by causing a notice of the time and place of the hearing to be posted at the county courthouse at least 10 days before the hearing. The court may order such further notice as it deems proper.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 854 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 36.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

858.

The court shall hear evidence for or against the petition and may order judgment on the petition vesting the interest of the delinquent in the mine or mining claim in the petitioner.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 855 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 37.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

859.

A certified copy of the decree may be recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which any part of the mine or mining claim is situated.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 856 by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 38.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Validating Proceedings [860. - 870.5.]

860.

A public agency may upon the existence of any matter which under any other law is authorized to be determined pursuant to this chapter, and for 60 days thereafter, bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the public agency is located to determine the validity of such matter. The action shall be in the nature of a proceeding in rem.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

861.

Jurisdiction of all interested parties may be had by publication of summons pursuant to Section 6063 of the Government Code in a newspaper of general circulation designated by the court, published in the county where the action is pending and whenever possible within the boundaries of the public agency, and in such other counties as may be ordered by the court, and if there be no such newspaper in any such county or counties then in some adjoining county. In addition, prior to completion of such publication, the agency shall, to the extent which the court finds reasonably practicable, give notice of the pendency of the proceeding by mail or other means ordered by the
 court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

861.1.

The summons shall be directed to “all persons interested in the matter of [specifying the matter],” and shall contain a notice to all persons interested in the matter that they may contest the legality or validity of the matter by appearing and filing a written answer to the complaint not later than the date specified in the summons, which date shall be 10 or more days after the completion of publication of the summons. The summons shall provide a detailed summary of the matter the public agency or other person seeks to validate. The summons shall also state
 that persons who contest the legality or validity of the matter will not be subject to punitive action, such as wage garnishment or seizure of their real or personal property. Except as otherwise specified in this section the summons shall be in the form prescribed in Section 412.20.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 529, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

862.

Jurisdiction shall be complete after the date specified in the summons. Any party interested may, not later than the date specified in the summons, appear and contest the legality or validity of the matter sought to be determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 894.)
-------------------------------------------

863.

If no proceedings have been brought by the public agency pursuant to this chapter, any interested person may bring an action within the time and in the court specified by Section 860 to determine the validity of such matter. The public agency shall be a defendant and shall be served with the summons and complaint in the action in the manner provided by law for the service of a summons in a civil action. In any such action the summons shall be in the form prescribed in Section 861.1 except that in addition to being directed to “all persons interested in the matter of [specifying the matter],” it shall also be directed to the public agency. If the interested person bringing
 such action fails to complete the publication and such other notice as may be prescribed by the court in accordance with Section 861 and to file proof thereof in the action within 60 days from the filing of his complaint, the action shall be forthwith dismissed on the motion of the public agency unless good cause for such failure is shown by the interested person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1611.)
-------------------------------------------

864.

For purposes of this chapter, bonds, warrants, contracts, obligations, and evidences of indebtedness shall be deemed to be in existence upon their authorization. Bonds and warrants shall be deemed authorized as of the date of adoption by the governing body of the public agency of a resolution or ordinance authorizing their issuance, and contracts shall be deemed authorized as of the date of adoption by the governing body of the public agency of a resolution or ordinance approving the contract and authorizing its execution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

865.

If more than one action is pending concerning similar contests which may be brought under this chapter, they shall be consolidated for trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

866.

The court hearing the action shall disregard any error, irregularity, or omission which does not affect the substantial rights of the parties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

867.

Actions brought pursuant to this chapter shall be given preference over all other civil actions before the court in the matter of setting the same for hearing or trial, and in hearing the same, to the end that such actions shall be speedily heard and determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

867.5.

(a) In the event that an action is brought by a public agency pursuant to this chapter, and that public agency later dismisses the action after any party has answered, then, notwithstanding Section 863, the party that answered may file an action pursuant to this chapter within 30 days after the public agency’s dismissal was filed by the court.

(b) Subdivision (a) is not applicable to a case in which a public agency has by formal act rescinded the action on the matter subject to
 validation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 723, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

868.

The costs of any proceeding or action pursuant to this chapter may be allowed and apportioned between the parties or taxed to the losing party in the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1479.)
-------------------------------------------

869.

No contest except by the public agency or its officer or agent of any thing or matter under this chapter shall be made other than within the time and the manner herein specified. The availability to any public agency, including any local agency, or to its officers or agents, of the remedy provided by this chapter, shall not be construed to preclude the use by such public agency or its officers or agents, of mandamus or any other remedy to determine the validity of any thing or matter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1865.)
-------------------------------------------

870.

(a) The judgment, if no appeal is taken, or if taken and the judgment is affirmed, shall, notwithstanding any other provision of law including, without limitation, Sections 473 and 473.5, thereupon become and thereafter be forever binding and conclusive, as to all matters therein adjudicated or which at that time could have been adjudicated, against the agency and against all other persons, and the judgment shall permanently enjoin the institution by any person of any action or proceeding raising any issue as to which the judgment is binding
 and conclusive.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law including, without limitation, Section 901 and any rule of court, no appeal shall be allowed from any judgment entered pursuant to this chapter unless a notice of appeal is filed within 30 days after the notice of entry of the judgment, or, within 30 days after the entry of the judgment if there is no answering party. If there is no answering party, only issues related to the jurisdiction of the court to enter a judgment in the action pursuant to this chapter may be raised on appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   Effective July 21, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

870.5.

Any local public agency that pledges sales or retail transaction and use tax revenues received from taxes imposed by another public agency for bond payments or payment of other security obligations shall, in any validation action it files involving those bonds or other obligations, provide written notice thereof to the public agency imposing the taxes pledged as security for the bonds or other obligations at the time it files the validation action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 360, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Good Faith Improver of Property Owned by Another [871.1. - 871.7.]

871.1.

as used in this chapter, “good faith improver” means:

(a) A person who makes an improvement to land in good faith and under the erroneous belief, because of a mistake of law or fact, that he is the owner of the land.

(b) A successor in interest of a person described in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

871.2.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes an unincorporated association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

871.3.

(a) An action for relief under this chapter shall be treated as an unlimited civil case, regardless of the amount in controversy and regardless of whether a defendant cross-complains for relief under this chapter. Any other case in which a defendant cross-complains for relief under this chapter shall be treated as a limited civil case if the cross-complaint is defensive and the case otherwise satisfies the amount in controversy and other requirements of Section 85.

(b) In
 every case, the burden is on the good faith improver to establish that the good faith improver is entitled to relief under this chapter, and the degree of negligence of the good faith improver should be taken into account by the court in determining whether the improver acted in good faith and in determining the relief, if any, that is consistent with substantial justice to the parties under the circumstances of the particular case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 688, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

871.4.

The court shall not grant relief under this chapter if the court determines that exercise of the good faith improver’s right of setoff under Section 741 of the Code of Civil Procedure or right to remove the improvement under Section 1013.5 of the Civil Code would result in substantial justice to the parties under the circumstances of the particular case. In determining whether removal of the improvement would result in substantial justice to the parties under the circumstances of the particular case, the court shall take into consideration any plans the owner of the land may have for the use or development of the land upon which the improvement was made and his need for the
 land upon which the improvement was made in connection with the use or development of other property owned by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

871.5.

When an action or cross-complaint is brought pursuant to Section 871.3, the court may, subject to Section 871.4, effect such an adjustment of the rights, equities, and interests of the good faith improver, the owner of the land, and other interested parties (including, but not limited to, lessees, lienholders, and encumbrancers) as is consistent with substantial justice to the parties under the circumstances of the particular case. The relief granted shall protect the owner of the land upon which the improvement was constructed against any pecuniary loss but shall avoid, insofar as possible, enriching him unjustly at the expense of the good faith improver. In protecting
 the owner of the land against pecuniary loss, the court shall take into consideration the expenses the owner of the land has incurred in the action in which relief under this chapter is sought, including but not limited to reasonable attorney fees. In determining the appropriate form of relief under this section, the court shall take into consideration any plans the owner of the land may have for the use or development of the land upon which the improvement was made and his need for the land upon which the improvement was made in connection with the use or development of other property owned by him.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 244.)
-------------------------------------------

871.6.

Nothing in this chapter affects the rules of law which determine the relief, if any, to be granted when a person constructs on his own land an improvement which encroaches on adjoining land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

871.7.

(a) This chapter does not apply where the improver is a public entity or where the improvement is made to land owned or possessed by a public entity. As used in this section, “public entity” includes the United States, a state, county, city and county, city, district, public authority, public agency, or any other political subdivision or public corporation.

(b) This chapter does not apply where the owner of the land upon which the improvement is constructed has appropriated the land to a public use and could have acquired the land for that use by exercising the power of eminent
 domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 150.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Actions to Recover COVID-19 Rental Debt [871.10. - 871.12.]

871.10.

(a) In any action seeking recovery of COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02, the plaintiff shall, in addition to any other requirements provided by law, attach to the complaint documentation showing that the plaintiff has made a good faith effort to investigate whether governmental rental assistance is available to the tenant, seek governmental rental assistance for the tenant, or cooperate with the tenant’s efforts to obtain rental assistance from any governmental entity, or other third party pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 1947.3 of the Civil Code.

(b) In
 an action subject to subdivision (a), the court may reduce the damages awarded for any amount of COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02, sought if the court determines that the landlord refused to obtain rental assistance from the state rental assistance program created pursuant to Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 50897) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, if the tenant met the eligibility requirements and funding was available.

(c) An action to recover COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02, that is subject to this section shall not be commenced before November 1, 2021.

(d) Subdivisions (a) through
 (c), inclusive, shall not apply to an action to recover COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02, that was pending before the court as of January 29, 2021.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (g), any action to recover COVID-19 rental debt, as defined in Section 1179.02, that is subject to this section and is pending before the court as of January 29, 2021, shall be stayed until
 November 1, 2021.

(f) This section shall not apply to any unlawful detainer action to recover possession pursuant to Section 1161.

(g) (1) Actions for breach of
 contract to recover rental debt that were filed before October 1, 2020, shall not be stayed and may proceed.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to actions filed against any person who would have qualified under the rental assistance funding provided through the Secretary of the Treasury pursuant to Section 501 of Subtitle A of Title V of Division N of the federal Consolidated Appropriations Act, 2021 (Public Law 116-260) if the person’s household income is at or below 80 percent of the area median income for the 2020 or 2021 calendar year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 27, Sec. 8.   (AB 832)   Effective June 28, 2021.   Repealed as of October 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 871.12.)
-------------------------------------------

871.12.

This chapter shall remain in effect until October 1, 2027, and as of the date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 27, Sec. 10.   (AB 832)   Effective June 28, 2021.   Repealed as of October 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 11, commencing with Section 871.10.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Actions for Restitution for or Replacement of Certain Motor Vehicles [871.20. - 871.30.]

871.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, this chapter applies to an action, brought against a manufacturer who has elected under Section 871.29 to proceed under this chapter, seeking restitution or replacement of a motor vehicle pursuant to subdivision (b) or (d) of Section 1793.2, Section 1793.22, or Section 1794 of the Civil Code, or for civil penalties pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1794 of the Civil Code, where the request for restitution or replacement is based on noncompliance with the applicable express warranty.

(b) This chapter does not apply to service contract claims under Section 1794 of the Civil Code or any action seeking remedies that are not restitution or replacement of a motor vehicle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 1, Sec. 2.   (SB 26)   Effective April 2, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

871.21.

(a) An action covered by Section 871.20 shall be commenced within one year after the expiration of the applicable express warranty.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), an action covered by Section 871.20 shall not be brought later than six years after the date of original delivery of the motor vehicle.

(c) The time periods prescribed in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be tolled as follows:

(1) As provided by tolling requirements prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 1793.22 of the Civil Code, as applicable.

(2) For the time the motor vehicle is out of service by reason of repair for any nonconformity.
